Hawaii statutes.
§353C-7 Federal reimbursement maximization
special fund. (a) There is established in the state treasury the federal
reimbursement maximization special fund, into which shall be deposited all
federal reimbursements received by the department relating to the State
Criminal Alien Assistance Program. Unless otherwise provided by law, all other
receipts shall immediately be deposited to the credit of the general fund of
the State.

(b) Moneys in the federal reimbursement
maximization special fund shall be used by the department for the following
purposes:

(1) To meet the state match requirement for federal
grants and costs associated with federal grant reporting requirements,
including administrative expenses such as the hiring of temporary staff;

(2) For any other purpose deemed necessary by the
department for maintaining existing federal grants as well as pursuing federal
grants;

(3) To hire consultants to provide training for
corrections officers;

(4) To hire consultants to conduct facility or
program evaluations;

(5) To rent or purchase vehicles to transport
inmates;

(6) To provide pre-release and reentry programs;

(7) To improve technology; and

(8) To recruit and retain corrections workforce.

(c) The department shall prepare and submit an
annual report on the status of the federal reimbursement maximization special
fund to the legislature no later than twenty days before the convening of each
regular session. The annual report shall include but not be limited to a
description of the use of the funds. [L 2001, c 172, §1; am L 2012, c 77, §1;
am L 2016, c 93, §1]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next